District of Columbia statutes.
47-103

Appointed officers to give security for intrusted moneys.

All officers appointed by the President for the District, who, by virtue of the provisions of any law of Congress, are required to give security for moneys that may be intrusted to them for disbursement, shall give such security at such time and in such manner as the Secretary of the Treasury may prescribe.

R.S., D.C., § 87
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-103.
1973 Ed., § 47-103.

Prior Codifications